Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2247SV (2) 91 th/jh S.F. 493 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68B.9 Use of tax revenue by 1 political subdivisions ââ lobbying restrictions. 2 1. A political subdivision shall not use moneys received 3 from the imposition of a tax to do any of the following: 4 a. Employ or compensate a lobbyist. 5 b. Pay an instrumentality that employs or compensates a 6 lobbyist. 7 2. a. For purposes of this section, âinstrumentalityâ means 8 an entity to which all of the following apply: 9 (1) The entity serves a governmental purpose or performs a 10 governmental function. 11 (2) The entity operates on behalf of one or more political 12 subdivisions. 13 (3) One or more political subdivisions have the powers and 14 interests of an owner with respect to the entity. 15 (4) Control and supervision of the entity is vested in 16 members of one or more political subdivisions. 17 b. â Instrumentalityâ includes but is not limited to the 18 following entities: 19 (1) The Iowa league of cities. 20 (2) The Iowa state association of counties and any affiliate 21 of the Iowa state association of counties. 22 (3) The Iowa school board association. 23 c. âInstrumentalityâ does not include a state, county, 24 or city insurance group entity or an employee benefits group 25 entity. 26 Sec. 2. Section 68B.34, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 68B.34 Additional penalty. 29 In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision 30 of law, a person who knowingly and intentionally violates a 31 provision of sections 68B.2A through 68B.8 68B.9 , sections 32 68B.22 through 68B.24 , or sections 68B.35 through 68B.38 33 is guilty of a serious misdemeanor and may be reprimanded, 34 suspended, or dismissed from the personâs position or otherwise 35 -1- LSB 2247SV (2) 91 th/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 493 sanctioned. 1